Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.490

Record of payment and redemption.

Whenever before the sale of any property the amount of any assessment thereon, with interest and costs accrued thereon, shall be paid to the treasurer, he or she shall thereupon mark the same paid, with the date of payment thereof on the assessment roll, and whenever after sale of any property for any assessments, the same shall be redeemed, he or she shall thereupon enter the same redeemed with the date of such redemption on such record. Such entry shall be made on the margin of the record opposite the description of such property.

[ 2011 c 336 s 270; 1907 c 153 s 43; RRS s 9258. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 43; 1893 c 84 s 43.]